Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-458
Methamphetamine precursor; terms,
defined.

For
purposes of sections 28-458 to 28-462:

(1) Exchange
means the National Precursor Log Exchange administered by the National Association
of Drug Diversion Investigators;

(2) Methamphetamine precursor means any
drug product containing ephedrine, pseudoephedrine, or phenylpropanolamine
that is required to be documented pursuant to the logbook requirements of
21 U.S.C. 830;

(3) Seller means any person who lawfully sells a methamphetamine
precursor pursuant to subdivision (1)(d) of section 28-456 or his or her employer;
and

(4) Stop-sale alert means a notification sent to a seller indicating
that the completion of a methamphetamine precursor sale would result in a
violation of subdivision (1)(d)(i) or (ii) of section 28-456.

Laws 2011, LB20, § 3.